California, session 20252026, AB262.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14475.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:14475.5. (a) The California Housing and Homelessness Agency shall create a study on issues impacting pregnant people experiencing homelessness.(b) The agency shall report the results of the study and recommendations on establishing a PINK Alert system to the Legislature by July 1, 2028.(c) The recommendations shall include, but not be limited to, how the PINK Alert can be a system that shall do all of the following:(1) Allow nonprofits to opt in to the system in order to get notifications if there is a pregnant person in need of emergency housing or prenatal services.(2) Notify nonprofit housing shelters, temporary housing, or overnight housing shelters that are capable of housing pregnant persons.(3) Be a program that can be registered for. (4) Automatically enroll organizations that are already a part of emergency services.(d) A report to be submitted pursuant to under subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.